zh-CN: 面罩笼架材质: 合金; 铝; 碳钢; 铬钼钢; 复合材料; 空心钢; 镁; 钢; 钛; 其他
sl-SI: Material mrežice maske: Zlitina; Aluminij; Ogljikovo jeklo; Krom-molibdenovo jeklo; Kompozit; Votlo jeklo; Magnezij; Jeklo; Titan; Drugo
pt-BR: Máscara grade material: Liga metálica; Alumínio; Aço carbono; Aço cromo-molibdênio; Composto; Aço oco; Magnésio; Aço; Titânio; Outro
de: Material des Maskengitters: Legierung; Aluminium; Kohlenstoffstahl; Chrom-Molybdän-Stahl; Verbundwerkstoff; Hohlstahl; Magnesium; Stahl; Titan; Sonstiges
sv: Monteringstyp för massflödessensor: Legering; Aluminium; Kolstål; Krommolybdenstål; Komposit; Ihåligt stål; Magnesium; Stål; Titan; Annat
nl: Masker kooi materiaal: Legering; Aluminium; Koolstofstaal; Chromoly-staal; Composiet; Hol staal; Magnesium; Staal; Titanium; Overige
ru: Материал каркаса маски: Сплав; Алюминий; Углеродистая сталь; Хромомолибденовая сталь; Композит; Полая сталь; Магний; Сталь; Титан; Другое
pt-PT: Material da estrutura da máscara: Liga; Alumínio; Aço ao carbono; Aço cromo-molibdénio; Compósito; Aço oco; Magnésio; Aço; Titânio; Outro
cs: Materiál klece masky: Slitina; Hliník; Uhlíková ocel; Chrom-molybdenová ocel; Kompozit; Dutá ocel; Hořčík; Ocel; Titan; Jiné
vi: Vật liệu lồng mặt nạ: Hợp kim; Nhôm; Thép cacbon; Thép chromoly; Composite; Thép rỗng; Magiê; Thép; Titan; Khác
ko: 마스크 케이지 소재: 합금; 알루미늄; 탄소강; 크로몰리 강; 복합재; 중공강; 마그네슘; 강철; 티타늄; 기타
tr: Maske kafesi malzemesi: Alaşım; Alüminyum; Karbon Çelik; Kromoli Çelik; Kompozit; İçi Boş Çelik; Magnezyum; Çelik; Titanyum; Diğer
th: วัสดุโครงหน้ากาก: ล้ออัลลอย; อะลูมิเนียม; เหล็กคาร์บอน; เหล็กโครโมลี; วัสดุผสม; เหล็กกลวง; แมกนีเซียม; เหล็กกล้า; ไทเทเนียม; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Materijal kaveza maske: Legura; Aluminij; Ugljični čelik; Krom-molibdenski čelik; Kompozit; Šuplji čelik; Magnezij; Čelik; Titanij; Ostalo
da: Materiale til maskebeskyttelse: Legering; Aluminium; Kulstofstål; Krom-molybdænstål; Komposit; Hult stål; Magnesium; Stål; Titanium; Andet
pl: Materiał kratki maski: Stop; Aluminium; Stal węglowa; Stal chromowo-molibdenowa; Kompozyt; Stal rurkowa; Magnez; Stal; Tytan; Inne
nb: Materiale for maskebur: Legering; Aluminium; Karbonstål; Krommolybdenstål; Kompositt; Hulstål; Magnesium; Stål; Titan; Annet
fi: Maskin kehikon materiaali: Metalliseos; Alumiini; Hiiliteräs; Kromimolybdeeniteräs; Komposiitti; Ontto teräs; Magnesium; Teräs; Titaani; Muu
it: Materiale della griglia della maschera: Lega; Alluminio; Acciaio al carbonio; Acciaio al cromo-molibdeno; Materiale composito; Acciaio cavo; Magnesio; Acciaio; Titanio; Altro
el: Υλικό πλέγματος μάσκας: Κράμα; Αλουμίνιο; Ανθρακούχος χάλυβας; Χρωμιομολυβδαινιούχος χάλυβας; Σύνθετο; Κοίλος χάλυβας; Μαγνήσιο; Χάλυβας; Τιτάνιο; Άλλο
hu: Maszk rácsrészének anyaga: Ötvözet; Alumínium; Szénacél; Króm-molibdén acél; Kompozit; Csőacél; Magnézium; Acél; Titán; Egyéb
es: Material de la jaula de la máscara: Aleación; Aluminio; Acero al carbono; Acero cromolio; Compuesto; Acero hueco; Magnesio; Acero; Titanio; Otro
ro-RO: Materialul cuștii măștii: Aliaj; Aluminiu; Oțel carbon; Oțel crom-molibden; Compozit; Oțel tubular; Magneziu; Oțel; Titan; Altele
lt-LT: Kaukės grotelių medžiaga: Lydinys; Aliuminis; Anglinis plienas; Chromolio plienas; Kompozitas; Tuščiaviduris plienas; Magnis; Plienas; Titanas; Kita
sk-SK: Materiál klietky masky: Zliatina; Hliník; Uhlíková oceľ; Chróm-molybdénová oceľ; Kompozit; Dutá oceľ; Horčík; Oceľ; Titán; Iný
en: Mask cage material: Alloy; Aluminum; Carbon Steel; Chromoly Steel; Composite; Hollow Steel; Magnesium; Steel; Titanium; Other
ja: マスクケージ素材: 合金; アルミニウム; 炭素鋼; クロモリ鋼; コンポジット; 中空鋼; マグネシウム; スチール; チタン; その他
zh-TW: 面罩護籠材質: 合金; 鋁; 碳鋼; 鉻鉬鋼; 複合材料; 中空鋼; 鎂; 鋼; 鈦; 其他
bg-BG: Материал на решетката на маската: Сплав; Алуминий; Въглеродна стомана; Хром-молибденова стомана; Композитен материал; Куха стомана; Магнезий; Стомана; Титан; Друго
fr: Matériau de la grille du masque: Alliage; Aluminium; Acier au carbone; Acier chromoly; Composite; Acier creux; Magnésium; Acier; Titane; Autre